nb: Tobakksstyrke: Ekstra sterk; Fyldig; Medium; Medium til fyldig; Mild; Mild til medium; Annet
hu: Dohány erőssége: Extra erős; Teljes; Közepes; Közepestől a teljesig; Enyhe; Enyhétől a közepesig; Egyéb
zh-TW: 菸草強度: 特濃; 濃郁; 中等; 中等到濃郁; 淡; 淡到中等; 其他
cs: Síla tabáku: Extra silný; Plný; Střední; Střední až plný; Jemný; Jemný až střední; Jiné
it: Intensità del tabacco: Extra forte; Forte; Medio; Medio-forte; Leggero; Leggero-medio; Altro
ro-RO: Tăria tutunului: Foarte tare; Tare; Mediu; Mediu spre tare; Slab; Slab spre mediu; Altele
hr-HR: Jačina duhana: Iznimno jako; Jako; Srednje; Srednje do jako; Blago; Blago do srednje; Ostalo
en: Tobacco strength: Extra strong; Full; Medium; Medium to full; Mild; Mild to medium; Other
sk-SK: Sila tabaku: Extra silný; Plný; Stredný; Stredný až plný; Jemný; Jemný až stredný; Iné
ru: Крепость табака: Очень крепкий; Крепкий; Средней крепости; От средней крепости до крепкого; Мягкий; От мягкого до средней крепости; Другое
de: Tabakstärke: Extrastark; Kräftig; Mittel; Mittel bis kräftig; Mild; Mild bis mittel; Sonstige
sv: Tobaksstyrka: Extra stark; Fyllig; Medium; Medium till fyllig; Mild; Mild till medium; Övrigt
fi: Tupakan vahvuus: Erittäin vahva; Täyteläinen; Keskivahva; Keskivahvasta täyteläiseen; Mieto; Miedosta keskivahvaan; Muu
vi: Cường độ thuốc lá: Rất đậm; Đậm đà; Vừa; Vừa đến đậm đà; Nhẹ; Nhẹ đến vừa; Khác
pt-PT: Intensidade do tabaco: Extra forte; Intenso; Médio; Médio a intenso; Suave; Suave a médio; Outra
ko: 담배 강도: 매우 강함; 강함; 중간; 중간 ~ 강함; 순함; 순함 ~ 중간; 기타
sl-SI: Moč tobaka: Zelo močan; Poln; Srednji; Srednji do poln; Blag; Blag do srednji; Drugo
bg-BG: Сила на тютюна: Изключително силен; Плътен; Среден; Среден до плътен; Лек; Лек до среден; Друго
es: Intensidad del tabaco: Extra fuerte; Fuerte; Medio; Medio a fuerte; Suave; Suave a medio; Otro
tr: Tütünün yoğunluğu: Ekstra sert; Sert; Orta; Orta-sert; Hafif; Hafif-orta; Diğer
el: Ένταση καπνού: Πολύ βαρύ; Βαρύ; Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο προς βαρύ; Ελαφρύ; Ελαφρύ προς μεσαίο; Άλλο
da: Tobaksstyrke: Ekstra stærk; Fyldig; Medium; Medium til fyldig; Mild; Mild til medium; Andet
pl: Moc tytoniu: Bardzo mocny; Pełny; Średni; Średni do pełnego; Łagodny; Łagodny do średniego; Inny
fr: Force du tabac: Extra fort; Fort; Moyen; Moyen à fort; Doux; Doux à moyen; Autre
nl: Tabakssterkte: Extra sterk; Vol; Medium; Medium tot vol; Mild; Mild tot medium; Overige
pt-BR: Tabaco intensidade: Extraforte; Encorpado; Médio; Médio a encorpado; Suave; Suave a médio; Outros
ja: タバコの強さ: エクストラストロング; フル; ミディアム; ミディアム〜フル; マイルド; マイルド〜ミディアム; その他
th: ความแรงของยาสูบ: เข้มข้นมาก; เต็มรสชาติ; ปานกลาง; ปานกลางถึงเต็มรสชาติ; อ่อน; อ่อนถึงปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Tabako stiprumas: Ypač stiprus; Stiprus; Vidutinis; Nuo vidutinio iki stipraus; Lengvas; Nuo lengvo iki vidutinio; Kita
zh-CN: 烟草强度: 超浓郁; 浓郁; 中等; 中等偏浓郁; 柔和; 柔和偏中等; 其他